California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.10.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any peace officers association which is composed entirely of active and retired peace officers, which holds regular meetings and has regular dues, and which owns, leases, operates, or maintains an establishment for association purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.11.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any firemen’s association which is composed entirely of active and retired firemen, which holds regular meetings and has regular dues, and which owns, leases, operates, or maintains an establishment for association purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.12.

For purposes of this article “club” also means any nonprofit social and religious club which owns or leases, operates and maintains a club room or rooms for its membership, and has operated the club room or rooms for a period of not less than eight years, and has regular membership dues of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) per year per member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.13.

For purposes of this article, “club” also means any club operated by a common carrier by air at an airport terminal. This type of club shall qualify for a license under this article notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23037. The provisions of Sections 23399, 23434, and 23435 and the numerical limitation of Section 23430 shall not apply to this type of club.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   (SB 325)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.14.

For purposes of this article, “club” also means any club operated by commissioned or noncommissioned officers of the National Guard or Air National Guard which owns or leases, operates and maintains a clubroom or rooms for its membership. Such a club, if issued a club license pursuant to Section 23430, may sell and serve alcoholic beverages for consumption within the licensed establishment only to bona fide members of the club and their bona fide guests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.15.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any parlor of the American Citizens Club in existence on the effective date of this chapter which the club has as the owner, lessee, or occupant thereof operated as an establishment for fraternal purposes and in which alcoholic beverages are sold only to members of the club whose membership dues in the club have been paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.16.

For purposes of this article, “club” also means any nonprofit social luncheon club which is composed entirely of active and retired professional men and businessmen, which holds regular meetings and has regular annual membership dues in excess of two hundred dollars ($200), which owns, leases, operates or maintains such establishment for the serving of regular meals to its members and their guests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.17.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any department or local forum of the American GI Forum of the U.S. which owns or leases, operates and maintains a club room or rooms for its membership. Such a club, if issued a club license pursuant to Section 23430, may sell and serve alcoholic beverages for consumption within the licensed establishment only to bona fide members of the club and their bona fide guests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.18.

For purposes of this article, “club” also means any labor council which is chartered by a national labor organization having affiliates in each state of the United States, consists of delegates from not less than 20 separately chartered affiliated labor organizations, as defined by the National Labor Relations Act, the combined membership of which is not less than 7,000 persons, and owns or leases a building of not less than 3,000 square feet which is used by the delegates, or members of affiliated labor organizations, or both, for their social activities. No labor council which makes any discrimination, distinction, or restriction against any person on account of such
 person’s age, sex, color, race, religion, ancestry, or national origin shall be licensed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.19.

For purposes of this article, “club” also means any private club organized to play handball or racquetball, which owns, maintains, or operates a building containing not less than four regulation-size handball or racquetball courts, which has members, and the members each pay regular monthly dues. As used in this section, a “regulation-size handball or racquetball court” is a court meeting the standards for regulation courts as are promulgated by the United States Handball Association or an equivalent organization.

It
 shall be unlawful for any club licensed pursuant to this section to make any discrimination, distinction, or restriction against any person on account of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.20.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any bona fide nonprofit corporation that has been in existence for not less than nine years, has more than 8,500 memberships issued and outstanding to owners of condominiums and owners of memberships in stock cooperatives, and owns, leases, operates, or maintains recreational facilities for its members.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any bona fide nonprofit corporation that was formed as a condominium homeowners’ association, has at least 250 members, has served daily meals to its members and guests for a period of not less than 12 years, owns or leases, operates, and maintains a clubroom or rooms for its membership, has an annual fee of not less than nine hundred dollars ($900) per year per member, and has as a condition of membership that one member of each household be at least 54 years of age.

(c) Section 23399 and the numerical limitation of Section 23430 shall not apply to a club defined in this section.

(d) No license shall be issued pursuant to this section to any club that withholds membership or denies facilities or services to any person on account of any basis listed in subdivision (a)
 or (d) of Section 12955 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926, 12926.1, subdivision (m) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 12955, and Section 12955.2 of the Government Code.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), with respect to familial status, subdivision (d) shall not be construed to apply to housing for older persons, as defined in Section 12955.9 of the Government Code. With respect to familial status, nothing in subdivision (d) shall be construed to affect Sections 51.2, 51.3, 51.4, 51.10, 51.11, and 799.5 of the Civil Code, relating to housing for senior citizens. Subdivision (d) of Section 51, Section 4760, and Section 6714 of the Civil Code, and subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) of Section 12955 of the Government Code shall apply to subdivision (d).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 7.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.21.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any local dental society having an authorized delegate to the California Dental Association and composed entirely of dentists duly admitted, licensed and qualified to practice dentistry within the state, which has at least 250 members and has been in existence for a period of more than 20 years and which owns, leases, operates or maintains a club room or rooms for its members, and has operated the club room or rooms for a period of not less than three years.

No license shall be issued pursuant to this section to any club which restricts membership or in any other
 way discriminates against any person in the use of any of its facilities, on the basis of race, religion, national origin, sex, or age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1008, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.22.

For purposes of this article, “club” also means any nonprofit corporation whose principal purpose is to promote cultural ties and understanding between citizens of a foreign country or commonwealth and citizens of the United States, which has a bona fide membership of more than 10,000 members each of whom pay regular membership dues, which owns, leases, operates or maintains an establishment for fraternal purposes. Such a club, if issued a license pursuant to Section 23430, may sell and serve alcoholic beverages for consumption within the licensed establishment only to bona fide members of the club and their bona fide guests.

No
 license shall be issued pursuant to this section to any club which restricts membership or the use of any of its facilities on the basis of race, religion, national origin, or sex.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.23.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any letter carriers local which is chartered by a national labor organization having affiliates in each state of the United States, which consists of not less than 1,500 members as defined by the National Labor Relations Act, and which owns or leases a building of not less than 5,000 square feet that is used by the members, or by the members of other labor organizations, or both, for their social activities. No letter carriers local which makes any discrimination, distinction, or restriction against any person on account of such person’s age, sex, color, race, religion, ancestry, or national origin shall be licensed
 pursuant to this section. No club licensed under this section shall engage in the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption outside of the licensed premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.24.

For the purposes of this article “club” also means any bona fide nonprofit social organization which has more than 350 members and which has as the owner, lessee, or occupant thereof operated an establishment for its members and which has been in existence for more than five years and whose purpose is to foster and develop social relations among its members and to foster pride in the national origin of its members by promoting appreciation of such national origin and its contribution to the American social order.

It shall be unlawful for any club licensed pursuant to this section to make any discrimination, distinction, or
 restriction against any person on account of such person’s color, race, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, or age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1446.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.25.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any Hidalgo Society the purpose of which is to operate for the advancement of education for the improvement of social and economic conditions, to help lessen neighborhood tension, lessen the burden on welfare systems, to help eliminate prejudice and discrimination and for other charitable causes that might be present in the community. Such a group shall be located in a county of the 32nd class, have members who pay dues, and shall own, lease, or maintain a club room or rooms for its membership.

It shall be unlawful for any club licensed pursuant to this section to make any
 discrimination, distinction, or restriction against any person on account of such person’s color, race, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, or age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.26.

For the purposes of this article, “ club” also means any nonprofit property owners’ association having at least 2,500 members. Such an association must have been in existence for at least five years as of October 1, 1975, and must engage in some volunteer action for the community of which it is a part.

It shall be unlawful for any club licensed pursuant to this section to make any discrimination, distinction, or restriction against any person on account of such person’s color, race, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, or age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.27.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any peace officers’ and employees’ association which is composed entirely of active and retired peace officers and employees of a law enforcement agency which holds regular meetings, is located in a county of the first class, and the members of which pay regular dues.

No license shall be issued pursuant to this section to any club which restricts membership or in any other way discriminates against any person in the use of any of its facilities because of that person’s color, race, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, or
 age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   Effective September 3, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.28.

For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any beach and athletic club that owns, maintains, or operates a standard Amateur Athletic Union (AAU) swimming pool together with the necessary facilities and clubhouse, has a minimum of 500 members paying regular monthly dues, and has continuously operated for not less than one year.

No license shall be issued to any beach and athletic club qualifying as a club pursuant to this section if the beach and athletic club in any manner restricts membership or the use of its
 facilities on the basis of age or any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23428.29.

(a) For the purpose of this article, “club” also means a nonprofit umbrella organization established to provide a central meeting location, resources, and services specifically for veterans, including those on active duty, and that owns or leases, operates, and maintains a facility for these purposes. The nonprofit umbrella organization shall serve at least six veteran organizations, composed solely of veterans, that have been chartered by the Congress of the United
 States for patriotic, fraternal, or benevolent purposes and which post, chapter, camp, or other local unit has operated as such for not less than one year.

(b) For purposes of this section, members of the veteran organizations served by the nonprofit umbrella organization shall be deemed to be members of the nonprofit umbrella organization regardless of whether they are charged separate dues to hold that membership.

(c) The nonprofit umbrella organization shall obtain documentation from the veteran organizations it serves as may be necessary to establish that those veteran organizations meet the requirements of this section. The documentation shall be provided to the department upon demand.

(d) It shall be unlawful for any club licensed pursuant to this section to make any discrimination, distinction, or restriction
 against any person on account of the person’s color, race, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, or age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 363, Sec. 1.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23429.

A club as defined in this article is a bona fide club within the meaning of Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23430.

The department may issue one club license to any club as defined in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

23431.

The holder of a club license may exercise all of the rights and privileges permitted by an on-sale general license but may sell and serve alcoholic beverages for consumption within the licensed establishment only to bona fide members of the club and their bona fide guests. A club license is not transferable from person to person. The provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this division do not apply to the issuance of club licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23432.

Any club which holds an onsale general license which was originally issued to it prior to April 1, 1947, and which transfers its onsale general license to another person shall not be eligible to apply for a club license for a period of at least one year following the date of the transfer of its onsale general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1066.)
-------------------------------------------

23433.

The department may issue an off-sale license to any golf club which has more than 400 bona fide members, which owns, maintains, or operates a regular golf links together with a clubhouse thereon, and which has operated the establishment for not less than 60 years, which license authorizes the sale, to consumers only and not for resale, of alcoholic beverages which an off-sale general licensee may sell, but only to bona fide members of the club and their bona fide guests. A license issued to a golf club pursuant to this section is not transferable. The provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this division do not apply to the issuance of a license pursuant to this section. The application fee for a license issued pursuant to this section shall be the same as the fee for a retail package off-sale general license
 as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) Section 23320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 31.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23433.5.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “club” also means any nonprofit lawn bowls club.

(b) No license shall be issued to any nonprofit lawn bowls club qualifying as a club pursuant to this section if the nonprofit lawn bowls club in any manner restricts membership or the use of its facilities on the basis of age or any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 273, Sec. 1.   (AB 2793)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

23434.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, on and after the effective date of this section, no new club license shall be issued to any club which is not a nonprofit organization.

(b) On and after the effective date of this section, no club license shall be issued to a nonprofit corporation pursuant to a law enacted after the effective date of this section unless the nonprofit corporation engages in at least some volunteer action for the community of which it is a part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23435.

On and after January 1, 1980, no new club license shall be issued for any club, organization, or association which does not have at least 100 members and which has not been in existence for at least one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

23437.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no club license issued under this article shall entitle the holder to any off-sale privileges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

23438.

(a) Any alcoholic beverage club licensee which restricts membership or the use of its services or facilities on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, except for genetic information, shall, when issuing a receipt for expenses which may otherwise be used by taxpayers for deduction purposes pursuant to Section 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code,
 for purposes of the Personal Income Tax Law, or Section 24343 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for purposes of the Bank and Corporation Tax Law, incorporate a printed statement on the receipt as follows:

“The expenditures covered by this receipt are nondeductible for state income tax purposes or franchise tax purposes.”

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Expenses” means expenses, as defined in Section 17269 or 24343.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) “Club” means a club holding an alcoholic beverage license pursuant to the provisions of this division, except a club holding an alcoholic beverage license pursuant to Section 23425.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Veterans’ Club Licenses [23450. - 23455.]

23450.

As used in this article, “veteran” means any person who has served in the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Space Force, or as an active nurse in the service of the American Red Cross, or in the Army and Navy Nurse Corps in time of war, or in any expedition of the Armed Forces of the United States, or who served in one of these services during the period September 16, 1940, to December 7, 1941, and received a discharge under conditions other than dishonorable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 1.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23451.

Any post, chapter, camp, or other local unit, composed solely of veterans, of an organization composed solely of veterans which has been chartered by the Congress of the United States for patriotic, fraternal, or benevolent purposes, and which post, chapter, camp, or other local unit has, as the owner, lessee, or occupant thereof, operated an establishment for any such purpose for not less than one year, is a bona fide club within the meaning of Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution and of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23452.

The department may issue one veterans’ club license to any post, chapter, camp or other local unit described in Section 23451 for the establishment, if otherwise satisfactory, where the post, chapter, camp, or other local unit maintains its club.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

23452.5.

The department may also issue one veterans’ club license to any veterans’ memorial association which is a nonprofit private corporation organized for patriotic, fraternal, or benevolent purposes, composed solely of veterans, and which has more than 18,000 bona fide regular members, and which owns, leases, maintains, or operates a clubhouse and has continuously operated a clubhouse for not less than three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 597.)
-------------------------------------------

23453.

(a) The holder of a veterans’ club license may exercise all of the rights and privileges permitted by an on-sale general license but may sell and serve alcoholic beverages for consumption within the licensed establishment only to bona fide members of the veterans’ organization and their bona fide guests, bona fide members of other veterans’ organizations, active duty or reserve members of the Armed Forces,
 or veterans as defined in Section 18540.4 of the Government Code.

(b) A veterans’ club license is not transferable to another person from the person to whom issued or by whom renewed. The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23815) of Chapter 5 do not apply to the issuance of veterans’ club licenses.

(c) A bona fide member of a veterans’ organization, bona fide guest, active duty or reserve member of the Armed Forces, or veteran is not required to sign in to a roster before purchasing or being served alcoholic beverages for consumption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   (SB 685)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23454.

No member and no officer, agent, or employee of a veterans’ club licensee shall be paid or shall directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation, any of the profits from the distribution or sale of alcoholic beverages to the licensee or to the members of the licensee or its guests, beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed and voted at any regular meeting by the members of the licensee or by its governing body out of the general revenue of the local unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23455.

The department may revoke any license issued pursuant to this article whenever, in the judgment of the department, the licensee ceases to operate as a bona fide club.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Craft Distiller’s Licenses [23500. - 23508.]

23500.

This act shall be known, and may be referenced as, the Craft Distillers Act of 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 640, Sec. 2.   (AB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23501.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The regulation and licensing of the sale of alcoholic beverages in this state has operated for over 80 years under what is commonly referred to as the “three-tier system,” which generally prohibits vertical integration within the distilled spirits industry. This system has helped in protecting against undue marketing influences within the distilled spirits industry and assisted the goals of promoting temperance and reasonable regulation of the sale of distilled spirits within the state. In addition, this system has helped create thousands of jobs and billions of dollars in economic development within
 California.

(b) Small craft distillers have begun to operate in this state, and these craft distillers have begun to increase employment and provide jobs and economic development in various locations within the state.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this act, to encourage the development of the craft distilling industry within the state by enacting various limited exemptions to the general provisions of the three-tier system, while also continuing to uphold and support the three-tier system as the appropriate mechanism for regulating and licensing the sale of distilled spirits in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 640, Sec. 2.   (AB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23502.

(a) The department may issue a craft distiller’s license to a person that has facilities and equipment for the purposes of, and is engaged in, the commercial manufacture of distilled spirits. The craft distiller’s license authorizes the licensee to do all of the following:

(1) Manufacture distilled spirits. For purposes of this article, “manufacture” means the actual distillation of distilled spirits from naturally fermented materials or the redistillation of distilled spirits obtained from another manufacturer of distilled spirits.

(2) Produce distilled spirits. For purposes of this article, “produce” means to mix, color,
 flavor, or blend distilled spirits, whether manufactured by the licensee or by another manufacturer of distilled spirits, including spirits of wine produced by a winegrower pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 23358.

(3) Only sell distilled spirits that are manufactured or produced by the licensee solely to a wholesaler, manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, or rectifier that holds a license authorizing the sale of distilled spirits or to persons that take delivery of those distilled spirits within this state for delivery or use without the state.

(4) Deal in warehouse receipts.

(5) Manufacture or produce up to 150,000 gallons of distilled spirits per fiscal year (July 1 through June 30),
 excluding brandy the craft distiller manufactures or has manufactured for it pursuant to a brandy manufacturer license, as reported to the department in the manner prescribed by the department for the fiscal year prior to the date of submitting an application for the license. At least 65 percent of the total volume of distilled spirits manufactured or produced shall be actually manufactured by the licensee. The volume of distilled spirits authorized by this paragraph shall be calculated by adding the volume of distilled spirits, less waste, drawn off the still with the volume of distilled spirits obtained by the licensee from any other source that is not redistilled by the licensee. For purposes of this paragraph, “volume” means the liquid volume and shall not be based on proof gallons or packaged goods.

(6) Transport brandy to or
 from the premises of any licensed winegrower for the purpose of storing the brandy to age on the winegrower’s premises.

(b) A craft distiller’s license shall not be issued to any person, any officer, director, employee, or agent of such person, or any person who is affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a person that manufactures or has manufactured for them more than 150,000 gallons of distilled spirits per year within or without the state, excluding brandy it manufactures or has manufactured for them pursuant to a brandy manufacturer license, or to any person that is affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a wholesaler.

(c) A licensed craft distiller shall report to the department, at the time of renewal in the manner prescribed by the department, the amount of distilled
 spirits manufactured or produced by the licensee specifying, as applicable, the respective amounts of distilled spirits the licensed craft distiller has manufactured itself, obtained from another manufacturer of distilled spirits, and imported, excluding brandy manufactured by or for the licensee pursuant to a brandy manufacturer license, during the previous fiscal year. If the report to the department establishes that the licensee no longer qualifies to hold a craft distiller’s license because the licensee has either exceeded the 150,000 gallon manufacture or production limitation as specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) or actually manufactured less than 65 percent of the total volume of distilled spirits as specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), the department shall renew the license as a distilled spirits manufacturer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23504.

Notwithstanding any other provision, a licensed craft distiller may sell up to the equivalent of 4.5 liters in any combination of prepackaged containers per day per consumer of distilled spirits manufactured or produced by the licensee at its premises to a consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 295, Sec. 3.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23504.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division to the contrary, a licensed craft distiller, or a qualifying out-of-state distiller whose license is not suspended, may directly ship distilled spirits manufactured or produced by the licensee at its premises to a consumer only if they comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) The amount shipped shall not exceed the equivalent of 2.25 liters in any combination of prepackaged containers per day per consumer and shall be solely for the consumer’s
 personal use and not for resale.

(2) The licensed craft distiller, or qualifying out-of-state distiller, shall maintain adequate records of the shipments and provide those records to the department upon request.

(3) The licensed craft distiller, or qualifying out-of-state distiller, shall require the common carrier to obtain the signature of any individual 21 years of age or older before delivering any distilled spirits
 shipped to an individual in this state.

(4) The containers in which the distilled spirits are shipped shall be conspicuously labeled with the words: “CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 YEARS OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY.”

(5) The licensed craft distiller, or qualifying out-of-state distiller, shall hold a current distilled spirits direct shipper permit issued by the department.

(b) To obtain and maintain a distilled spirits direct shipper permit from the department, the craft distiller, or qualifying out-of-state distiller, shall do all of the following:

(1) File an application for a distilled spirits direct shipper permit with the department.

(2) Pay the same fees that apply to a direct shipper permit (Type 82).

(3) Provide the department with the craft distiller’s California alcoholic beverage license number or a true copy of their current alcoholic beverage distiller license issued by another state, as applicable.

(4) If the permitholder is located outside of this state, report to the
 department no later than January 1, 2027, the total amount of distilled spirits shipped into the state during the preceding calendar year under the distilled spirits direct shipper permit.

(5) If the permitholder is located within this state, provide to the department any necessary additional information not currently provided to ensure compliance with this section.

(6) Permit the department to perform an audit of the distilled spirits direct shipper permitholder’s records upon request.

(7) Be
 deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the department or any other state agency and California courts concerning enforcement of this section and any related laws, rules, or regulations.

(c) The department may enforce the requirements of this section by administrative proceedings to suspend or revoke the distilled spirits direct shipper permit, and the department may accept payment of an offer in compromise in lieu of suspension as provided by this division. Any hearing held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code against a permitholder outside of California shall be held in the City of Sacramento.

(d) A person shall not sell and ship distilled spirits directly to consumers in California without possessing a current distilled spirits direct shipper permit issued by the department. A person who knowingly makes, participates in, transports, imports, or receives a shipment from a person who does not possess a current distilled spirits direct shipper permit issued by the department pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor pursuant to Section 25617.

(e) For purposes of this section, “qualifying out-of-state distiller” means a distiller licensed in any other state that satisfies the conditions necessary for a craft distiller license under the laws of this state.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 295, Sec. 4.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23506.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a licensed craft distiller or one or more of its direct or indirect subsidiaries of which the licensed craft distiller owns not less than a 51-percent interest, who manufactures or produces, bottles, processes, imports, or sells distilled spirits under a craft distiller’s license or any other license issued pursuant to this division, or any officer or director of, or any person holding any interest in, those persons may serve as an officer or director of, and may hold the ownership of any interest or any financial or representative relationship in, any on-sale license, or the business conducted under that license, provided that, except in the case of a holder of on-sale general licenses for airplanes and duplicate on-sale general licenses for air common carriers, all
 of the following conditions are met:

(1) The on-sale licensee purchases all alcoholic beverages sold and served only from California wholesale licensees.

(2) The number of distilled spirits items by brand offered for sale by the on-sale licensee that are manufactured, produced, bottled, processed, imported, or sold by the licensed craft distiller or by the subsidiary of which the licensed craft distiller owns not less than 51 percent, or by any officer or director of, or by any person holding any interest in, those persons does not exceed 15 percent of the total distilled spirits items by brand listed and offered for sale by the on-sale licensee selling and serving that distilled spirit. Notwithstanding paragraph (1), distilled spirits sold pursuant to this provision may be purchased from a California licensed craft distiller so long as the distilled spirits purchased are produced
 or bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the same licensed craft distiller that holds an interest in the on-sale license and such direct sales do not involve more than two on-sale licenses in which the licensed craft distiller or any person holding an interest in the licensed craft distiller holds any interest, directly or indirectly, either individually or in combination or together with each other in the aggregate.

(3) None of the persons specified in this section may have any of the interests specified in this section in more than two on-sale licenses.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a licensee that has an interest in one or more
 on-sale retail licenses pursuant to this section may continue to hold that interest in the event the licensee no longer qualifies as a craft distiller, provided that the interest was
 held, or an application was pending, at a time when the licensee did hold a craft distiller’s license pursuant to Section 23502. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to prevent the department from denying a pending application for any reason other than the change in license of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 423, Sec. 4.   (AB 2913)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23508.

(a) A licensed craft distiller may also have upon its licensed premises all beers, wines, and distilled spirits, regardless of source, for sale or service only to guests during private events or private functions not open to the general public. Alcoholic beverage products sold at the premises that are not manufactured or produced and bottled by, or manufactured or produced and packaged for, the licensed craft distiller shall be purchased by the licensed craft distiller only from a licensed wholesaler.

(b) A licensed craft distiller may sell all beers, wines, brandies, or distilled spirits to consumers for consumption on the premises in a bona fide eating place as defined in